Arkansas, session 2025, SB538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-11-217(c), concerning the powers and
duties of State Procurement Director, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(16) Within one hundred twenty (120) days after the effective
date of a new or revised statute or rule relating to procurement, shall
review the procurement materials of the office and revise the procurement
materials to maintain alignment between the procurement materials and the
relevant procurement statutes and rules.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-11-229(f), concerning competitive sealed
bidding, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(4)(A) A state agency may determine that the cost of the bid is
unrealistic.
(B) As used in this subdivision (f)(4), "unrealistic"
means too low to reflect the ability of the bidder to meet the requirements
of the invitation for bids.
(C) The director shall promulgate rules concerning the
requirements for determining that a bid is unrealistic.

*JLL310*
04-07-2025 18:41:04 JLL310

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 S4/7/25 SB538
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-11-230(c), concerning competitive sealed
proposals, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Public Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this
section, public notice of the request for proposals shall be given in the
same manner as provided in § 19-11-229(d), which refers to public notice of
competitive sealed bidding.
(2)(A) A request for proposals under this section shall be
issued at least twenty (20) business days before the deadline for the
submission of proposals.
(B) If a request for proposals is reissued before the
anticipation to award, the state agency shall extend the original deadline
for the submission of proposals by at least ten (10) business days.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 19-11-230(d)(4), concerning competitive
sealed proposals, is amended to read as follows:
(4) A state agency shall: not
(A) Not include prior experience with the state as a
mandatory requirement for submitting a proposal under this section;
(B) Evaluate the cost of each proposal received from a
responsible offeror in response to a request for proposals under this section
in the state agency's initial evaluation of the proposals; and
(C) Not identify responsible offerors as being reasonably
susceptible of being awarded a contract under this section until the cost
proposal from each responsible offeror has been evaluated.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 19-11-230(d), concerning competitive sealed
proposals, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(5)(A) A state agency may determine that the cost of the
proposal is unreasonable or unrealistic.
(B) As used in this subdivision (d)(5):
(i) "Unrealistic" means too low to reflect the
ability of the offeror to meet the requirements of the request for proposals;
and
(ii) "Unreasonable" means too high for the
requirements of the request for proposals.
(C) The director shall promulgate rules concerning the
04-07-2025 18:41:04 JLL310

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 S4/7/25 SB538
requirements for determining that the cost of a proposal is unreasonable or
unrealistic.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 19-11-230(e), concerning competitive sealed
proposals, is amended to add additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(4)(A) Negotiations under this section shall be conducted by a
person who is trained and certified in negotiation and procurement processes.
(B)(i) The office shall provide for the training and
certification required under subdivision (e)(4)(A) of this section.
(ii) The training provided by the office under this
subdivision (e)(4) shall be specific to Arkansas law.
(5) The director shall promulgate rules detailing the
requirements for negotiations under this section.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 19-11-230, concerning competitive sealed
proposals, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(j) A state agency using the method of procurement provided for under
this section shall adhere to the procurement rules, policies, and guidance
issued by the office concerning the scoring of the technical and cost
elements of submitted proposals.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 19-11-244(a)(5)(B), concerning the
resolution of a protest by a person named in an anticipation to award a
contract, is amended to read as follows:
(B) A response to a protest submitted under subdivision
(a)(5)(A) of this section shall be submitted in writing within five (5)
calendar days of the date the person is given notice of the protest under
subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this section.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 19-11-244(d), concerning the resolution of
protested solicitations and awards of contracts, is amended to read as
follows:
(d) A copy of the decision under subsection (c) of this section shall
be mailed or otherwise furnished within five (5) calendar days after it is
written to the protestor and any other party intervening.

04-07-2025 18:41:04 JLL310

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 S4/7/25 SB538
SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 19-11-244(f), concerning the resolution of
protested solicitations and awards of contracts, is amended to read as
follows:
(f) In the event of a timely protest under subsection (a) of this
section,: the
(1) The state shall not execute a contract that is the result of
the protested solicitation or award unless the director or the head of the
relevant procurement agency makes a written determination that the execution
of the contract without delay is necessary to protect substantial interests
of the state; and
(2) Contract negotiations with the anticipated awardee may
proceed.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 19-11-245(e) and (f), concerning debarment
and suspension under the Arkansas Procurement Law, are amended to read as
follows:
(e) Notice of Decision. A copy of the decision under subsection (d) of
this section shall be mailed or otherwise furnished within five (5) calendar
days after it is written to the debarred or suspended person and any other
party intervening.
(f) Finality of Decision. A decision under subsection (d) of this
section shall be final and conclusive and not an order as defined in the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., but may be
appealed to the Secretary of the Department of Shared Administrative Services
in accordance with the rules promulgated by the director.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 19-11-247(a)–(c), concerning the remedies
for unlawful solicitation or award of a contract, are amended to read as
follows:
(a) The provisions of this section apply where it is determined upon
any review provided by law that a solicitation or award the creation,
solicitation, award, management, or modification of a contract is in
violation of law.
(b) If prior to award it is determined that a solicitation, or
proposed award, or modification of a contract is in violation of law, then
the solicitation, or proposed award, or modification shall be:
04-07-2025 18:41:04 JLL310

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 S4/7/25 SB538
(1) Cancelled; or
(2) Revised to comply with the law.
(c) If after an award it is determined that a solicitation or award
the creation, solicitation, award, management, or modification of a contract
is in violation of law, then in addition to or in lieu of other remedies
provided by law:
(1) If the person awarded the contract vendor has not acted
fraudulently or in bad faith:
(A) The contract may be ratified and affirmed if it is
determined that doing so is in the best interests of the state; or
(B) The contract may be terminated; and
(2) If the person awarded the contract vendor has acted
fraudulently or in bad faith:
(A) The contract may be declared null and void; or
(B) The person awarded the contract may be directed to
proceed with performance of the contract and pay such damages, if any, as may
be appropriate if such action shall be in the best interests of the state.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 19-11-279, concerning requests for
information, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(f) A response to a request for information under this section is not
required for a vendor's bid, proposal, or statement of qualifications and
performance data to be accepted unless the response requirement is:
(1) Explicitly stated in the invitation for bids, request for
proposals, or request for statements of qualifications and performance data;
and
(2) Approved by the director or the head of the procurement
agency.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 19-11-280(a), concerning the training and
certification of procurement personnel, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The State Procurement Director shall establish a an in-person
training and certification program to facilitate the training, continuing
education, and annual certification of state agency procurement personnel.
(2) The training and certification program required under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section may be offered through an in-person
04-07-2025 18:41:04 JLL310

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 S4/7/25 SB538
training course or a live, virtual course.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 19-11-280(c), concerning the training and
certification of procurement personnel, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Beginning July 1, 2021, a A state agency employee shall not
conduct a procurement under this chapter unless the state agency employee is
certified annually through the training and certification program required
under this section.
(2) To maintain certification under this section, a state agency
employee shall complete a reasonable number of hours of continuing education
each year, as provided for by rule by the director.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 19-11-280, concerning the training and
certification of procurement personnel, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) The director shall report to the Review Subcommittee of the
Legislative Council concerning:
(A) The progress made in developing an implementing the
training and certification program required under this section; and
(B) The state agencies that have had employees complete
the training and certification program required under this section.
(2) The report required under section shall be presented:
(A) For the first year following the effective date of
this act, every ninety (90) days; and
(B) Annually each subsequent year.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 11, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-11-282. Notification to Office of State Procurement.
A state agency other than an institution of higher education shall
notify the Office of State Procurement that the state agency is going to
issue an invitation for bids or a request for proposals at least seven (7)
calendar days before issuing the solicitation.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 19-11-802(c)(2), concerning annual
statements of qualifications and performance data and restrictions on
04-07-2025 18:41:04 JLL310

As Engrossed: S4/2/25 S4/7/25 SB538
competitive bidding, is amended to read as follows:
(2) A political subdivision shall may elect to not use
competitive bidding for the procurement of other professional services with a
two-thirds (⅔) vote of its governing body.

SECTION 19. DO NOT CODIFY. Repromulgation of rules.
(a) Within one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective date of this
act, the State Procurement Director shall repromulgate all rules related to
the sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act and the recommendations
adopted by the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council upon the
conclusion of the procurement study conducted for the 2025 regular session to
ensure that the rules promulgated under the sections of the Arkansas Code
that are amended by this act are in line with the intent of the General
Assembly in enacting this act.
(b) The director shall submit a monthly report to the Review
Subcommittee of the Legislative Council concerning his or her progress during
the reporting period in complying with subsection (a) of this section.

/s/Gilmore

















04-07-2025 18:41:04 JLL310